Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.640.030

Administration.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be required to monitor the compliance by local school districts with this chapter, shall establish a compliance timetable and regulations for enforcement of this chapter, and shall establish guidelines for affirmative action programs to be adopted by all school districts.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.85.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 226: See note following RCW 28A.640.010.